Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 6.8
TONY GRAMPSAS YOUTH SERVICES PROGRAM

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2013. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding this article, see section 1 of chapter 169, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

Section

26-6.8-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 6.8, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the Tony Grampsas youth services board created in section 26-6.8-103.

"Entity" means a local government, a Colorado public or not-for-profit school, a group of public or not-for-profit schools, a school district or group of school districts, a board of cooperative services, an institution of higher education, the Colorado National Guard, or a private nonprofit or not-for-profit community-based organization.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the state department of human services.

"State department" means the state department of human services.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1117), ch. 169, p. 573, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

IP and (2) amended, (SB 22-037), ch. 23, p. 148, § 1, effective March 17.

26-6.8-102. Tony Grampsas youth services program - creation - standards - applications.

The Tony Grampsas youth services program is transferred to the state department. All program grants in existence as of July 1, 2013, shall continue to be valid through June 30, 2014. Persons appointed to the board shall continue serving until completion of their terms and may be reappointed as provided in section 26-6.8-103.

The Tony Grampsas youth services program is established to provide state funding for community-based programs:

To provide prevention and intervention services in an effort to reduce incidents of youth crime and violence;

To provide prevention and intervention services in an effort to reduce the occurrence and reoccurrence of child abuse and neglect and to reduce the need for state intervention in child abuse and neglect prevention and education;

For the prevention and intervention of youth alcohol, tobacco, marijuana, and other drug use; and

For the prevention and intervention of student drop out.

The board shall choose those entities that will receive grants through the Tony Grampsas youth services program and the amount of each grant. The state department shall administer the grants awarded and monitor the effectiveness of programs that receive grants through the Tony Grampsas youth services program.

Repealed.

Any grant awarded through the Tony Grampsas youth services program shall be paid from moneys appropriated pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection (2) or out of the general fund for the program. The board, in accordance with the timelines adopted pursuant to section 26-6.8-103 (3), shall submit a list of the entities chosen to receive grants to the governor for approval. The governor shall either approve or disapprove the entire list of entities by responding to the board within twenty days. If the governor does not respond to the board within twenty days after receipt of the list, the list is approved. The board shall not award a grant through the Tony Grampsas youth services program without the prior approval of the governor.

The youth services program fund is created in the state treasury. The principal of the fund consists of tobacco litigation settlement money transferred by the state treasurer to the fund pursuant to section 24-75-1104.5 (1.7)(e). Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the state department may expend money from the fund for the Tony Grampsas youth services program, including the compensation of youth members of the Tony Grampsas youth services board, as described in section 26-6.8-103 (1)(e)(II). All unexpended and unencumbered money appropriated to the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains available for expenditure by the state department for the Tony Grampsas youth services program in the following fiscal year without further appropriation and must not be transferred or revert to the general fund state at the end of a fiscal year.

In addition to the moneys appropriated to the youth services program fund pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d), the fund also consists of any moneys appropriated to the fund from the marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501, C.R.S. Any moneys in the fund attributable to the marijuana tax cash fund shall be used for community-based programs for the prevention and intervention of marijuana use. Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d), any unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the fund at the end of a fiscal year that are attributable to the marijuana tax cash fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred to the tobacco litigation settlement cash fund or any other fund.

If an entity seeks a grant from the board for a program directed at providing alcohol, tobacco, marijuana, and other drug use prevention and intervention services to youth, one of the criteria the board must consider is whether the program utilizes evidence-based practices in the delivery of services.

To participate in the Tony Grampsas youth services program, an entity may apply to the board in accordance with timelines and guidelines adopted by the board pursuant to section 26-6.8-103.

Entities seeking to provide youth mentoring services or to enhance existing youth mentoring programs are encouraged to submit an application to the board for grants directly from the Tony Grampsas youth services program, in addition to any funding the entities may be seeking from the youth mentoring services cash fund pursuant to section 26-6.8-104 (6), to establish or enhance youth mentoring programs. Entities submitting applications for grants directly from the Tony Grampsas youth services program pursuant to this section need not meet the requirements of section 26-6.8-104 (5)(b).

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1117), ch. 169, p. 574, § 5, effective July 1; (2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 13-1239), ch. 307, p. 1629, § 3, effective July 1; (2)(d) amended, (HB 13-1181), ch. 74, p. 239, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1)(b) and (2)(d) amended, (SB 14-215), ch. 352, p. 1615, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2)(d)(I) amended, (HB 15-1365), ch. 245, p. 904, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(2)(d)(I) amended, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, p. 471, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(2)(d)(I) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 92, § 128, effective February 25; (1)(b), (2)(d)(I), and (2)(d)(III) amended and (2)(b) repealed, (SB 22-037), ch. 23, p. 148, § 2, effective March 17.

26-6.8-103. Tony Grampsas youth services board - members - duties.

There is created the Tony Grampsas youth services board, which is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105. The board consists of the following members:

Four adult members appointed by the governor;

Two youth members appointed by the governor;

Three adult members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

Two adult members appointed by the president of the senate; and

One adult member appointed by the minority leader of the senate.

No more than seven of the members appointed to the board may be affiliated with the same political party.

In addition to the appointed board members, the executive director or the executive director's designee shall serve as a member of the board.

In appointing adult members to the board, the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president and the minority leader of the senate shall:

Choose persons who have a knowledge and awareness of innovative strategies for youth crime and violence prevention and intervention services and for reducing the occurrence and reoccurrence of child abuse and neglect; and

Appoint one or more persons who possess knowledge and awareness of early childhood care and education. As used in this subsection (1)(d)(I)(B), "early childhood" means younger than nine years of age.

In appointing members to the board, the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall each appoint at least one person who has a knowledge and awareness of student issues, including the causes of student dropout in secondary schools, as well as innovative strategies for reducing the dropout rate among secondary school students.

In appointing members to the board, the governor shall:

Appoint at least one person who is representative of a minority community;

Appoint at least one person who is knowledgeable in the area of child abuse and neglect prevention and intervention; and

Appoint at least one person who is knowledgeable in the area of youth crime and violence prevention and intervention.

In appointing youth members to the board, the governor shall appoint members who are fifteen years of age or older but under twenty-six years of age. A youth board member who reaches twenty-six years of age during the youth board member's term may remain on the board for the remainder of the term.

The board shall choose a chair and vice-chair from among its members.

The appointed members of the board shall serve three-year terms; except that the terms of appointed members shall be staggered so that no more than a minimum majority of the appointed members' terms expire in the same year. If a vacancy arises in one of the appointed offices, the authority making the original appointment shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term.

Adult members of the board shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed out of available appropriations for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Youth members of the board may receive a per diem as compensation for their service, which per diem may not exceed thirty dollars for each day upon which each youth member performs the member's duties for the board. Youth members of the board may also be reimbursed out of available appropriations for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The board is authorized to meet, when necessary, via telecommunications.

The board shall develop and make available program guidelines, including but not limited to:

Guidelines for proposal design;

Local public-to-private funding match requirements; and

Processes for local review and prioritization of program applications.

In addition to the guidelines developed pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the board shall develop criteria for awarding grants under the Tony Grampsas youth services program, including but not limited to the following requirements:

That the program is operated in cooperation with a local government, a local governmental agency, or a local nonprofit or not-for-profit agency;

That the program is community-based, receiving input from organizations in the community such as schools, community mental health centers, local nonprofit or not-for-profit agencies, local law enforcement agencies, businesses, and individuals within the community; and

(II.5) That the grant application process identifies and prioritizes funding programs that meet a need in the community, including, but not limited to, the presence of risk factors in a grant applicant's intended populations; and

That the program is directed at providing prevention and intervention services to children, youth, and their families in an effort to decrease incidents of youth crime and violence; prevent child abuse and neglect; or decrease youth alcohol, tobacco, marijuana, and other drug use, or that the program is directed at providing services to students and their families in an effort to reduce the dropout rate in secondary schools pursuant to section 26-6.8-105.

If an entity is seeking a grant from the board for a student dropout prevention and intervention program pursuant to section 26-6.8-105, one of the criteria that the board shall consider is whether the program has been implemented elsewhere, if known, and, if so, the relative success of the program. It is not required, however, that the program be previously implemented for the board to award a grant to the entity.

If an entity is seeking a grant from the board for a program directed at providing prevention and intervention services to youth and their families in an effort to decrease incidents of youth crime and violence, one of the criteria that the board shall consider is whether the program includes restorative justice components. It is not required, however, that the program include restorative justice components for the board to award a grant to the entity.

In addition to the guidelines and criteria developed pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2), the board shall develop result-oriented criteria for measuring the effectiveness of programs that receive grants under the Tony Grampsas youth services program as deemed appropriate to the nature of each program including, but not limited to, requiring grantees to evaluate the impact of the services provided by the program. Any criteria developed pursuant to this paragraph (c) for measuring the effectiveness of student dropout prevention and intervention programs established pursuant to section 26-6.8-105 shall include the implementation of a method by which to track the students served by the program to evaluate the impact of the services provided, which tracking shall continue, if possible, for at least two years or through graduation from a secondary school, whichever occurs first.

In addition to the guidelines and criteria developed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the board shall establish timelines for submission and review of applications for grants through the Tony Grampsas youth services program. The board shall also adopt timelines for submission to the governor of the list of entities chosen to receive grants. If the governor disapproves the list, the board may submit a replacement list within thirty days after such disapproval.

The board shall review all applications received pursuant to section 26-6.8-102 for grants from the Tony Grampsas youth services program and choose those entities that shall receive grants through the Tony Grampsas youth services program and the amount of each grant.

In addition to the duties relating specifically to the Tony Grampsas youth services program specified in this section, the board shall operate the prevention and intervention programs specified in this article 6.8 and such other prevention and intervention programs as may be assigned to the board by executive order to be funded by federal money, state money, or both. All unexpended and unencumbered money appropriated to the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains available for expenditure by the state department for the Tony Grampsas youth services program in the following fiscal year without further appropriation and must not be transferred or revert to the general fund at the end of a fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1117), ch. 169, p. 575, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(a), IP(1)(d)(I), and (1)(e) amended and (1)(d)(IV) added, (HB 15-1365), ch. 245, p. 903, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 65, § 89, effective February 25; (1)(b), (1)(d)(I)(A), (1)(d)(III)(B), (1)(d)(III)(C), (1)(d)(IV), IP(2)(b), (2)(b)(III)(A), (2)(b)(III)(C), and (5) amended and (2)(b)(II.5) added, (SB 22-037), ch. 23, p. 149, § 3, effective March 17; (1)(a) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3377, § 70, effective August 10.

26-6.8-104. Colorado youth mentoring services.

Short title. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Youth Mentoring Services Act".

Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that mentoring programs have been active in Colorado for many years. The general assembly finds that national research has indicated that structured mentoring programs are effective tools in combating youth substance use, youth crime and violence, and other challenges faced by youth. The general assembly further finds, based upon recent national research results, that youth who are matched in professionally supported mentoring relationships are less likely to become involved in substance and alcohol use, less likely to be truant, less likely to commit violent acts against other persons, and more likely to show improvements in academic performance and positive peer relations.

The general assembly further finds that, despite the positive results that may be achieved through structured youth mentoring programs, counties in the state of Colorado do not have the organizational resources necessary to carry out successful mentoring programs or lack volunteers to establish such programs, or both. The general assembly finds that even counties in which there are established youth mentoring programs, such programs are unable to meet the demand for mentors.

The general assembly therefore declares and determines that the provision of youth mentoring services that would use public and private entities to recruit, train, screen, and supervise volunteers to serve as mentors for youth would be beneficial and in the best interests of the citizens of the state of Colorado.

Definition. For purposes of this section, "youth" means a person who is five years of age or older but under twenty-five years of age and who is challenged by such risk factors as poverty, residence in a substance-abusing household, family conflict, association with peers who commit crimes, residence in a single-parent household, exhibition of indicia of delinquent behavior, or being the victim of child abuse.

Provision of youth mentoring services. There is created the Colorado youth mentoring program to provide state funding for the provision of evidence-informed youth mentoring services in an effort to reduce youth substance use, decrease the incidents of youth crime and violence, and increase protective factors for youth. The funding must be used to provide evidence-informed youth mentoring services in communities that do not have existing mentoring programs as well as to enhance established evidence-informed youth mentoring programs that are already in existence.

Administration - duties of contracting entities.

To be eligible for money from the youth mentoring services cash fund created in subsection (6) of this section for the provision of evidence-informed youth mentoring services, an entity must apply to the board in accordance with the timelines and guidelines adopted by the board pursuant to section 26-6.8-103 and must meet the requirements of subsection (5)(b) of this section.

An entity selected by the board to provide an evidence-informed youth mentoring program shall:

Adhere to evidence-informed standards of practice. An evidence-informed youth mentoring program uses a model that is evaluated annually and incorporates research evidence into its design and delivery. An entity that is awarded a grant shall annually demonstrate proof that evidence-informed standards are applied throughout the program. An entity must demonstrate proof that it applies evidence-informed standards by presenting current proof of compliance for achievement from an evaluation concerning the application of evidence-informed standards administered by an outside organization; and

Ensure mentoring is the primary service provided by the program and make intentional matches or formal connections between youths and mentors.

Community-based organizations may obtain private and public funds, grants, gifts, or donations for youth mentoring programs. The executive director may accept and expend on behalf of the state any funds, grants, gifts, or donations from any private or public source for the purpose of implementing this section; except that the executive director shall not accept a grant or donation if the conditions attached to the grant or donation require the expenditure thereof in a manner contrary to law.

Entities selected to receive grants pursuant to this section for the provision of youth mentoring services shall match any grant received with a contribution that is the equivalent of twenty percent of the grant awarded.

Youth mentoring services cash fund. There is created in the state treasury the youth mentoring services cash fund, referred to in this subsection (6) as the "fund". The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of implementing this section. All unexpended and unencumbered money appropriated to the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains available for expenditure by the state department for youth mentoring services in the following fiscal year without further appropriation and must not be transferred or revert to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year. The executive director may accept on behalf of the state any grants, gifts, or donations from any private or public source for the purpose of this section. All private and public money received through grants, gifts, or donations must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the fund. The general assembly may appropriate money from the marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501. All investment earnings derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund remains in the fund and must not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1117), ch. 169, p. 578, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(6) amended, (HB 15-1367), ch. 271, p. 1077, § 15, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

(6) amended, (HB 18-1369), ch. 253, p. 1556, § 7, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(2), (3), (4), (5)(a), (5)(b), and (6) amended, (SB 22-037), ch. 23, p. 151, § 4, effective March 17.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-20.5-203 as it existed prior to 2013.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1367, see section 1 of chapter 271, Session Laws of Colorado 2015. For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1369, see section 1 of chapter 253, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-6.8-105. Colorado student dropout prevention and intervention program.

Short title. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Student Dropout Prevention and Intervention Act".

Legislative declaration. The general assembly hereby finds that:

During the last decade, over one hundred thousand students in Colorado left school without successfully completing a high school program;

In 1996, three million six hundred thousand young adults in the United States were neither enrolled in school nor had they completed a high school program;

In the 1995-1996 academic year, approximately thirteen thousand students withdrew from Colorado schools prior to receiving a diploma, resulting in a four percent dropout rate;

Of those students who withdrew from Colorado schools prior to receiving a diploma, approximately five thousand nine hundred were minority students;

The dropout rate of minority students in Colorado is significantly greater than that of nonminority students;

Numerous factors, including socioeconomic background, lack of adult support, and the inability to communicate well in English, influence a student's decision to drop out of school;

Research has shown that, compared with high school graduates, relatively more dropouts are unemployed, and those dropouts who do succeed in finding work tend to earn less money than high school graduates; and

High school dropouts are more likely to apply for and receive public assistance than high school graduates.

Definitions. For purposes of this section, "student" means an individual enrolled in a primary or secondary school who is facing adversity such as dropping out of school because of the individual's socioeconomic background, lack of adult support, language barriers, or other identified indicators that cause school drop out.

Colorado student dropout prevention and intervention program. There is created the Colorado student dropout prevention and intervention program in the Tony Grampsas youth services program to provide services to students and their families in an effort to reduce the dropout rate in secondary schools through an appropriate combination of academic and extracurricular activities designed to enhance the overall education and edification of students in secondary schools.

Administration.

The state department shall administer the student dropout prevention and intervention program. Subject to the designation in subsection (5)(b) of this section, the board shall select those entities that will receive grants through the student dropout prevention and intervention program and the amount of each grant. In addition, the state department shall monitor the effectiveness of programs that receive funds through the student dropout prevention and intervention program. To be eligible for grants from the board for the provision of student dropout prevention and intervention programs for students, an entity must apply to the board in accordance with the timelines and guidelines adopted by the board pursuant to section 26-6.8-103.

Any moneys awarded by the board shall be paid from moneys appropriated out of the general fund for the Tony Grampsas youth services program. Each year no less than ten percent of the total appropriation from the general fund shall be designated and used exclusively for programs specifically designed to prevent students from dropping out of secondary schools; except that, commencing in fiscal year 2004-05 and in each fiscal year thereafter, no less than twenty percent of the total appropriation shall be designated and used exclusively for such purpose.

Receipt of money.

The executive director may accept on behalf of the state any funds, grants, gifts, or donations from any private or public source for the purpose of implementing student dropout prevention and intervention programs pursuant to this section; except that the executive director shall not accept funds, grants, gifts, or donations if the conditions attached thereto require the expenditure thereof in a manner contrary to law.

All private and public money received through funds, grants, gifts, or donations pursuant to this subsection (6) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the student dropout prevention and intervention fund, which fund is hereby created. The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs associated with the administration of this section. The executive director may expend money appropriated to the state department from the fund to provide a grant for implementing and administering a student dropout prevention and intervention program. All investment earnings derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund is credited to the fund. All unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains available for expenditure by the state department for student dropout prevention and intervention in the following fiscal year without further appropriation and must not be transferred or revert to the general fund at the end of a fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1117), ch. 169, p. 580, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(3), (4), (5)(a), and (6)(b) amended, (SB 22-037), ch. 23, p. 153, § 5, effective March 17.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-20.5-204 as it existed prior to 2013.

26-6.8-106. Colorado student before-and-after-school project - creation - funding.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Before-and-after-school program" means a program that meets before regular school hours or after regular school hours or during a period when school is not in session.

"Fund" means the Colorado student before-and-after-school project fund created in subsection (4) of this section.

"Project" means the Colorado before-and-after-school project created in subsection (2) of this section.

Colorado student before-and-after-school project. There is created, in the Tony Grampsas youth services program, the Colorado student before-and-after-school project to provide grants to entities to provide high-quality before-and-after-school programs that may include an alcohol, tobacco, or other drug use intervention, prevention, and education component. Entities that receive grants pursuant to this section shall apply the grants to creating and implementing before-and-after-school programs that primarily serve youth enrolled in grades six through eight or youth who are twelve to fourteen years of age. The before-and-after-school programs are designed to help youth develop their interests and skills in the areas of sports and fitness, character and leadership, or arts and culture and may provide education regarding the dangers of the use of alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs. Before-and-after-school programs that are designed primarily to increase academic achievement or that provide religious instruction are not eligible for funding pursuant to this section.

Administration.

The state department shall administer the project. The board shall select the entities that will receive grants through the project and the amount of each grant. In addition, the state department shall monitor the effectiveness of before-and-after-school programs that receive moneys through the project. To be eligible for grants through the project, an entity shall apply to the board in accordance with the timelines and guidelines adopted by the board pursuant to section 26-6.8-103. Notwithstanding any provision of this article or any criteria for awarding grants adopted by the board pursuant to section 26-6.8-103 (2)(b) to the contrary, an entity may be eligible to receive a grant pursuant to this section regardless of whether the before-and-after-school program to which the grant would apply serves youth who are eligible for free or reduced-cost lunch pursuant to the "Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1751 et seq.

The grants awarded through the project shall be paid from moneys appropriated from the fund to the state department. The board and grant recipients are encouraged to apply moneys awarded through the project to leverage additional funding as matching funds from private and federal sources.

Colorado student before-and-after-school project fund. There is created in the state treasury the Colorado student before-and-after-school project fund that consists of money that the general assembly may appropriate to the fund. The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department for the purpose of providing grants as provided in this section and the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation of this section. Any money in the fund not expended for the purpose of this section may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of money in the fund is credited to the fund. All unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains available for expenditure by the state department for before-and-after-school programs in the next fiscal year without further appropriation. Any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1117), ch. 169, p. 582, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(2) and (4) amended, (SB 22-037), ch. 23, p. 154, § 6, effective March 17.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-20.5-205 as it existed prior to 2013.